District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
29 may be cited as the “DC Young Adult Corps Act of 2026”.
30 Sec. 2. Definitions.
31 For purposes of this act, the term:
32 (1) “DME” means the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Education.
33 (2) “DOES” means the Department of Employment Services.
34 (3) “Eligible Individual” means a District resident who:
35 (A) Is at least 17 years of age and not older than 24 years of age; and
36 (B) Meets at least one of the following conditions:

37 (i) Has earned a high school equivalency credential, or a comparable
38 credential recognized under District law, within the 12 months immediately preceding application; or
39 (ii) Meets alternative eligibility criteria established by DOES through
40 rulemaking, consistent with the priorities identified by DME.
41 (4) “Service year” means a full-time service placement lasting up to 12 months.
42 (5) “Service placement” means a structured work and service assignment provided
43 through a host organization and approved by DOES.
44 (6) “Host organization” means a District agency, District of Columbia Public Schools,
45 public charter school, institution of higher education, nonprofit organization, or other public or private
46 entity approved by DOES to provide service placements.
47 (7) “Completion award” means a one-time payment issued by DOES to a participant
48 who successfully completes a service year at their service placement.
49 (8) “Fund” means the DC Young Adult Corps Fund established by section 9.
50 (9) “Program” means the DC Young Adult Corps Program established by this act.
51 Sec. 3. Establishment and purpose.
52 (a) There is established the District of Columbia Young Adult Corps Program, which shall
53 be administered by DOES under DME’s oversight and policy guidance, for the purposes of:
54 (1) Providing recent high school graduates and young adults with paid service
55 opportunities that build professional, educational, and civic skills;
56 (2) Strengthening the District’s workforce pipeline through service placements
57 aligned with community needs in education, health, environment, and public safety;
58 (3) Supporting District agencies, nonprofits, and schools in advancing local priorities
59 while developing the next generation of civic leaders; and
2

60 (4) Retaining District talent by connecting participants to local apprenticeships,
61 higher education, and employment.
62 (b) DME shall lead the front-end design, strategic direction, and cross-sector alignment of
63 the Program. In carrying out this responsibility, DME shall:
64 (1) Convene and chair the DC Young Adult Corps Advisory Group, which shall
65 consist of representatives from DME, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education, District
66 of Columbia Public Schools, the District of Columbia Public Charter School Board, the Workforce
67 Investment Council, the University of the District of Columbia, Serve DC, and any other agencies
68 or entities identified by DME;
69 (2) Develop and publish, at least annually, priority focus areas for service
70 placements based on District needs, workforce data, and stakeholder input;
71 (3) Establish baseline Program design requirements, including:
72 (A) Core competencies and training expectations for participants;
73 (B) Criteria for the approval of host organizations; and
74 (C) Standards for mentorship, supervision, and participant support;
75 (4) Coordinate with education and youth-serving agencies to support outreach and
76 recruitment of recent graduates and young adults, including integration of the Program into
77 postsecondary planning processes; and
78 (5) Issue written guidance to DOES as necessary to ensure that Program
79 implementation aligns with District education and workforce goals.
80 (d) DOES shall implement and operate the Program consistent with the priorities, standards,
81 and guidance established by DME and informed by the DC Young Adult Corps Advisory Group.
82 DOES shall:
3

83 (1) Operate the Program application, intake, and selection processes for eligible
84 individuals;
85 (2) Recruit, screen, and select participants consistent with the eligibility criteria
86 established by section 4 and any rules issued pursuant to this act;
87 (3) Identify, approve, contract with, and monitor host organizations consistent with
88 criteria established by DME;
89 (4) Process and disburse participant wages and benefits and administer completion
90 awards;
91 (5) Provide or coordinate training, mentorship support, and supportive services for
92 participants;
93 (6) Ensure that host organizations comply with applicable District and federal
94 workplace laws and Program requirements;
95 (7) Collect data on Program implementation and outcomes; and
96 (8) Submit reports to DME, the Mayor, and the Council as required under this act.
97 (e) DME and DOES shall consult regularly on Program implementation and may enter into
98 memoranda of understanding to clarify their respective roles and responsibilities consistent with
99 this section.
100 Sec. 4. Participant eligibility, selection, and responsibilities.
101 (a) DOES shall establish an application process for eligible individuals that is transparent,
102 accessible, and available online and through community-based partners.
103 (b) In selecting participants, DOES shall, to the extent practicable:
104 (1) Prioritize eligible individuals who face barriers to employment; and
4

105 (2) Consider the alignment between an eligible individual’s interests and skills and
106 available service placements.
107 (c) A participant in a service placement under the Program shall:
108 (1) Work at least 30 hours per week for the duration of the service year, unless DOES
109 approves an alternative schedule for good cause;
110 (2) Perform the duties of the service placement to the satisfaction of the host
111 organization and DOES;
112 (3) Participate in training, professional development, and supportive service activities
113 required by DOES or the host organization; and
114 (4) Participate in Program-wide events and activities intended to promote civic
115 engagement, leadership development, and awareness of District education and workforce
116 opportunities.
117 Sec. 5. Program structure and service placements
118 (a) The Program shall be designed by DME, in consultation with DOES and informed by the
119 DC Young Adult Corps Advisory Group, to:
120 (1) Provide full-time service placements of at least 30 hours per week;
121 (2) Include structured duties that serve District communities and support the
122 development of participant professional, educational, and civic skills;
123 (3) Provide ongoing coaching, supervision, and professional development
124 opportunities; and
125 (4) Offer cohort-based learning opportunities, civic engagement activities, and
126 exposure to postsecondary education, apprenticeships, and career pathways.
127 (b) Service placements operated by DOES shall:
5

128 (1) Address one or more of the priority focus areas identified by DME;
129 (2) Be hosted by an organization approved by DOES pursuant to criteria established by
130 DME;
131 (3) Include a designated mentor at the host organization responsible for participant
132 guidance and regular feedback;
133 (4) Comply with Program standards for supervision, training, and participant support
134 established by DME; and
135 (5) Be structured to provide meaningful service experience without displacing existing
136 employees or volunteers.
137 Sec. 6. Host organizations and Corps placements.
138 (a) DME shall establish criteria for the approval of host organizations, including standards for:
139 (1) Capacity to provide structured service roles, supervision, and mentorship;
140 (2) Compliance with applicable District and federal workplace laws; and
141 (3) Capacity to share data necessary to evaluate Program outcomes.
142 (b) DOES shall:
143 (1) Approve host organizations in accordance with the criteria established by DME;
144 (2) Enter into written agreements with host organizations setting forth Program
145 expectations, reporting requirements, workplace compliance requirements, and other conditions of
146 participation;
147 (3) Monitor host organizations for compliance with Program requirements and
148 applicable District and federal workplace laws; and
149 (4) Provide technical assistance to host organizations as needed.
150 (c) A host organization shall:
6

151 (1) Provide day-to-day supervision and mentorship to participants;
152 (2) Ensure that participant duties are appropriate to their training and experience and
153 consistent with the purposes of the Program;
154 (3) Maintain records and submit reports to DOES regarding participant attendance,
155 performance, and completion; and
156 (4) Comply with all applicable District and federal workplace requirements.
157 (d) A service year placement shall:
158 (1) Be of a duration established by DOES, which may be no less than 9 months and no
159 more than 12 months;
160 (2) Require a weekly schedule of service hours, not to exceed 40 hours per week, as
161 established by rule;
162 (3) Include supervision, mentorship, training, and structured professional development
163 activities, as required by DOES;
164 (4) Include a written service agreement signed by the participant, the host organization,
165 and DOES describing duties, expectations, compensation, training requirements, performance
166 standards, and conditions for successful completion;
167 (5) Provide a safe and structured work environment that meets all applicable workplace
168 protections under District law, including workers’ compensation coverage, paid sick leave, and
169 minimum wage requirements;
170 (6) Supplement, and not supplant, existing employees or volunteers, and not displace
171 existing employees, perform work ordinarily performed by employees of the host organization, or fill
172 any position that is vacant because of a labor dispute;
7

173 (7) Not include partisan political activity, campaign-related activity, or religious
174 proselytizing; and
175 (8) Comply with any additional requirements established by DOES by rule to ensure
176 participant safety, Program quality, and alignment with the purposes of this act.
177 Sec. 7. Participant compensation and completion awards.
178 (a) A participant in a service placement under the Program shall receive wages for all hours
179 worked. Wages shall be paid at a rate not less than the District’s minimum wage under section 4 of the
180 Minimum Wage Act Revision Act of 1992, effective Mar. 25, 1993 (D.C. Law 9-248; D.C. Official
181 Code § 32-1003) and may be paid at a higher rate as determined by agreement between DOES and the
182 host organization.
183 (b) DOES may provide wage subsidies to host organizations to support the cost of participant
184 compensation, and consistent with rules issued pursuant to this act.
185 (c) Compensation shall be paid on a regular schedule consistent with District payroll practices
186 or with the payroll practices of the host organization, as applicable, and in accordance with any
187 agreements executed under this act.
188 (d)(1) In accordance with criteria established by rule, DOES may provide a completion award
189 to a participant who successfully completes a service year.
190 (2) For the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, “successful completion” shall
191 include, at a minimum:
192 (A) Completion of required service hours;
193 (B) Satisfactory performance of duties as verified by the host organization;
194 (C) Participation in required training, professional development, and Program
195 activities; and
8

196 (D) Any additional requirements established by rule.
197 (3) A completion award shall be withheld in full until the participant has met all
198 requirements of successful completion established under paragraph (2) of this subsection. A
199 participant who does not successfully complete a service year shall not be entitled to a partial award
200 unless permitted by rule.
201 (4) A completion award shall not exceed $3,000 per participant.
202 (5) Completion awards shall be considered taxable income unless otherwise exempt
203 under federal law.
204 (e) DOES may provide or support additional benefits or allowances for participants, including
205 transportation assistance, supportive services, and other participant supports.
206 Sec. 8. Data collection, reporting, and evaluation.
207 (a) DOES shall collect and maintain data sufficient to evaluate the effectiveness and impact of
208 the Program. At a minimum, DOES shall collect data on:
209 (1) The number, characteristics, and demographic information of applicants and
210 participants, to the extent practicable;
211 (2) The number, type, and geographic distribution of service placements;
212 (3) Participant attendance, retention, and completion rates;
213 (4) Participant transitions into employment, apprenticeships, postsecondary education,
214 or training within 12 months following completion of the Program;
215 (5) Participant wages, credential attainment, and other measurable outcomes identified
216 by the DME; and
217 (6) Feedback from participants, host organizations, and mentors regarding Program
218 quality and effectiveness.
9

219 (b) No later than February 1 of each year, DOES shall submit to the Mayor, DME, and the
220 Council an annual report on the Program. The report shall, at a minimum:
221 (1) Present the data described in subsection (a) of this section, disaggregated to the
222 extent practicable by age, ward of residence, gender, race and ethnicity, disability status, and
223 education level;
224 (2) Analyze Program outcomes, including participant completion rates, transitions into
225 education or employment, and wage outcomes;
226 (3) Identify challenges and barriers encountered by participants, host organizations, and
227 administering staff;
228 (4) Provide recommendations for Program improvement, expansion, and alignment
229 with District education and workforce priorities;
230 (5) Describe coordination efforts between DOES, DME, and other District partners;
231 and
232 (6) Summarize host organization performance, including compliance with Program
233 requirements.
234 (c) DOES shall make the annual report required by subsection (b) of this section publicly
235 available on its website no later than 10 days after submission to the Council.
236 (d)(1) Subject to the availability of funds, DOES shall procure an independent evaluation of
237 the Program at least once every three years.
238 (2) The evaluation shall examine Program effectiveness, equity, and alignment with District
239 education and workforce outcomes. At a minimum, the evaluation shall:
240 (A) Assess participant experiences, including supervision quality, training, and
241 supportive services;
10

242 (B) Assess host organization performance and the overall quality of service
243 placements;
244 (C) Evaluate the extent to which the Program advances the priority focus areas
245 established by DME; and
246 (D) Make recommendations for Program improvement and cost-effectiveness.
247 (3) The independent evaluation shall be submitted to the Council and made publicly available
248 on DOES’s website within 30 days of receipt.
249 Sec. 9. DC Young Adult Corps Fund.
250 (a) There is established as a special fund, the “DC Young Adult Corps” (“Fund”), which shall
251 be administered by DOES in accordance with this section.
252 (b) The purposes of the Fund shall be to:
253 (1) Provide completion awards to Program participants;
254 (2) Provide wage subsidies, benefits, and supportive services for Program participants;
255 and
256 (3) Support the administration of the Program, including recruitment, outreach,
257 training, technical assistance, monitoring, reporting, evaluation, and related operational expenses.
258 (c) The Fund shall consist of:
259 (1) Money appropriated to the Fund in the annual budget and financial plan;
260 (2) Grants, gifts, or donations from any public or private source;
261 (3) Interest earned on money in the Fund; and
262 (4) Any other money received by the Fund.
263 (d) All money deposited into the Fund shall be used for the purposes described in subsection
264 (b) of this section.
11

265 (e) The Fund shall be a non-lapsing fund. All funds deposited into the Fund shall remain
266 available for the purposes set forth in this section without regard to fiscal year limitation.
267 (f) DOES shall maintain accounting records for the Fund in accordance with procedures
268 established by the Chief Financial Officer.
269 Sec. 10. Rulemaking.
270 The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
271 approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue rules to
272 implement the provisions of this act.
273 Sec. 11. Fiscal impact statement.
274 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
275 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
276 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
277 Sec. 12. Effective date.
278 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
279 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
280 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
281 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
12